Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Soil and Water Conservation
262.280.
Board to provide record — Audits of district accounts — Data to be furnished to commission.

The board shall provide for the keeping of a full and accurate record of all its proceedings and of all resolutions, regulations, and orders issued or adopted by it.

For fiscal periods ending prior to July 1, 2014, an audit of the accounts of each district shall take place once every four (4) years unless the district receives or expends seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) or more in any year, in which case the district shall provide for the performance of an annual audit. The audit shall be conducted in accordance with audit standards and requirements stipulated in KRS 65.065(5). For fiscal periods beginning on and after July 1, 2014, the provisions of KRS

65A.030

shall apply to audits of the accounts of each district.

Upon request of the commission, the board shall furnish the commission with copies of ordinances, regulations, orders, contracts, forms, and other documents adopted or employed by the board and any other information requested by the commission concerning the board’s activities.

History.

42i-7: amend. Acts 2007, ch. 114, § 2, effective June 26, 2007; 2013, ch. 40, § 72, effective March 21, 2013.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(3/21/2013). Under the authority of KRS

7.136

, the Reviser of Statutes has corrected a manifest clerical or technical error in subsection (2) of this statute. A period has been inserted before the phrase “for fiscal periods beginning on and after July 1, 2014,” and the first letter of the word “for” has been capitalized.

262.290.
Board may acquire, maintain and dispose of property — Other laws not to apply.

The board may obtain options upon and acquire in any way any property or rights or interests in property. It may maintain, administer and improve property acquired, receive the income therefrom and spend the income in administering this chapter. It may dispose of any of its property or interests in furtherance of this chapter.

The board may construct, improve and maintain structures necessary or convenient for the performance of operations authorized by this chapter.

No statute relating to the acquisition, operation or disposition of property by public bodies shall apply to a district unless the General Assembly specifically so states.

History.

42i-8.

262.300.
Board may conduct research work.

The board may conduct surveys, investigations and research relating to the character of soil erosion and the preventive and control measures needed, publish the results of the surveys, investigations or research and disseminate information concerning such preventive and control measures. No district shall initiate any research program except pursuant to a cooperative agreement entered into between the agricultural experiment station and the district.

History.

42i-8.

262.310.
Board may develop soil conservation plans.

The board may develop comprehensive plans for the conservation of soil resources and for the control and prevention of soil erosion within the district. The plans shall specify in such detail as may be possible, the acts, procedures, performances and avoidances which are necessary or desirable for the effectuation of the plans, including the specification of engineering operations, methods of cultivation, the growing of vegetation, cropping programs, tillage practices and changes in use of land. The board shall publish those plans and information and bring them to the attention of owners and occupiers of lands within the district.

History.

42i-8.

262.320.
Board may employ erosion-control measures — Cooperation with other agencies.

The board may carry out preventive and control measures within the district, including, but not limited to, engineering operations, methods of cultivation, the growing of vegetation, changes in use of land and other measures of soil conservation listed in KRS

262.020

, on lands owned or controlled by this state or any of its agencies, with the consent and cooperation of the agency administering and having jurisdiction of the lands and on any other lands within the district, upon obtaining the consent of the owners and occupiers of the lands or the necessary rights or interests in those lands.

In carrying on erosion-control and prevention operations, the board may cooperate or enter into agreements with any agency, governmental or otherwise, or any owner or occupier of lands within the district, subject to such conditions as the board deems necessary to advance the purposes of this chapter.

History.

42i-8.

262.330.
Board may furnish materials and equipment and prescribe conditions for benefits.

The board may make available or lease, on such terms as it prescribes, to landowners and occupiers within the district, agricultural and engineering machinery and equipment, fertilizer, seeds, seedlings and such other material or equipment as will assist the landowners and occupiers to carry on operations upon their lands for the conservation of soil resources and for the prevention and control of soil erosion.

As a condition to the extending of any benefits under this chapter to, or the performance of work upon, any lands not owned or controlled by this state or any of its agencies, the board may require contributions in money, services, materials or otherwise to any operations conferring such benefits, and require landowners and occupiers to enter into and perform such agreements or covenants as to the permanent use of their lands as will tend to prevent or control erosion.

HISTORY:

42i-8; 2022 ch. 239, § 5, effective April 26, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/26/2022). The language in subsection (1) of this statute has been modified in codification from the way it was enacted in order to reflect the Governor’s line-item veto of 2022 House Bill 604 ( 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 239, sec. 5).

262.340.
Board may take over government projects and receive contributions.

The board may:

Take over and administer any soil-conservation, erosion-control or erosion-prevention project located within its boundaries undertaken by the United States or any of its agencies, or by this state or any of its agencies;

Manage, as agent of the United States or any of its agencies, or of this state or any of its agencies, any soil-conservation, erosion-control or erosion-prevention project within its boundaries;

Act as agent for the United States or any of its agencies, or for this state or any of its agencies, in connection with the acquisition, construction, operation or administration of any soil-conservation, erosion-control or erosion-prevention project within its boundaries;

Accept contributions in money, services, materials or otherwise from the United States or any of its agencies, or from this state or any of its agencies, and use or expend those moneys, services, materials or other contributions in carrying on its operations.

History.

42i-8.

262.350.
Land-use regulations, what they may include.

Whenever the board determines that uncontrolled soil erosion on some lands within the district is causing damage to other lands within the district, it may propose regulations governing the use of lands within the district in the interest of conserving soil and soil resources and preventing and controlling soil erosion. The board may conduct such public meetings and public hearings upon tentative regulations as may be necessary to assist it in this work.

Land-use regulations may include:

Requirements for the carrying out of necessary engineering operations, including the construction of terraces, terrace outlets, check dams, dikes, ponds, ditches and other necessary structures;

Requirements for the observance of particular methods of cultivation, including contour cultivating, contour furrowing, lister furrowing, sowing, planting, strip cropping, seeding and planting of lands to water-conserving and erosion-preventing plants, trees and grasses, forestation and reforestation;

Specifications of cropping programs and tillage practices to be observed;

Requirements for the retirement from cultivation of highly erosive areas or of areas on which erosion may not be adequately controlled if cultivation is carried on; and

Provisions for such other measures and programs as may assist conservation of soil resources and prevent or control soil erosion in the district, with regard to KRS

262.020

.

History.

42i-9.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Prohibiting or regulating removal or exploitation of oil and gas, minerals, soil, or other natural products within municipal limits. 10 A.L.R.3d 1226.

Validity of Zoning Regulations Prohibiting or Regulating Removal or Exploitation of Oil and Gas, Including Hydrofracking, 84 A.L.R.6th 133.

262.360.
Board not to adopt land-use regulations before referendum.

The board shall not enact land-use regulations into law until after it has caused due notice to be given of its intention to conduct a referendum submitting such regulations to the owners and occupiers of lands lying within the boundaries of the district, the referendum has been held, and the board has considered the result of the referendum. The proposed regulations shall be embodied in a proposed ordinance.

History.

42i-9.

262.370.
Notice of referendum — Form of question.

Copies of the proposed land-use regulation shall be available for the inspection of all eligible voters during the period between publication of notice and the date of the referendum. The notices of the referendum shall recite the contents of the proposed regulation, or shall state where copies of the proposed regulation may be examined.

The question shall be submitted to the voters in the following form: “For approval of proposed ordinance No. . . . . . , prescribing land-use regulations for conservation of soil and prevention of erosion” and “Against approval of proposed ordinance No. . . . . . , prescribing land-use regulations for conservation of soil and prevention of erosion.” The voters shall be instructed to vote “yes” for one or the other of the propositions, as the voter may favor or oppose approval of the proposed regulation.

History.

42i-9: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 360, § 78, effective July 15, 1982.

262.380.
Board to supervise referendum — Effect of informalities.

The board shall supervise the referendum, prescribe appropriate regulations governing the conduct of the referendum and publish the result of the referendum. Only owners of lands within the district may vote in the referendum.

No informalities in the conduct of the referendum or in any matters relating to the referendum shall invalidate the referendum or its result if notice of the referendum shall have been given substantially as provided in KRS

262.370

and the referendum has been fairly conducted.

History.

42i-9.

262.390.
Votes necessary for approval — Effect of regulation.

The board shall not enact a proposed land-use regulation into law unless at least ninety percent (90%) of the votes cast in the referendum have been cast for approval of the proposed regulation, and unless landowners voting to enact the proposed regulation own at least eighty percent (80%) of the land within the district.

The approval of the regulation by ninety percent (90%) of the votes cast in the referendum shall not require the board to enact the proposed regulation into law.

Land-use regulations, proposed after the board has determined that uncontrolled soil erosion on some lands within the district is causing damage to other lands within the district, and prescribed in regulations adopted by the board shall have the force and effect of law in the district.

Land-use regulations apply to publicly owned lands, and shall be observed by agencies administering such lands.

History.

42i-9, 42i-14.

262.400.
Regulations to be uniform in district — Classification of lands.

Land-use regulations shall be uniform throughout the district except that the board may classify the lands within the district with reference to such factors as soil type, degree of slope, threatened or existing degree of erosion, cropping and tillage practices in use, and other relevant factors. The board may provide regulations varying with the type or class of land affected, but uniform as to all lands within each class or type. Copies of land-use regulations adopted shall be printed and made available to all owners and occupiers of lands lying within the district.

History.

42i-9.

262.410.
Amendment and repeal of regulations.

Any landowner within a district may at any time file a petition with the board asking that any or all of the land-use regulations prescribed in any ordinance adopted by the board shall be amended, supplemented or repealed. Land-use regulations shall not be amended, supplemented or repealed except in accordance with the procedure prescribed by KRS

262.350

to

262.390

for adoption of land-use regulations. Referendums on adoption, amendment, supplementation or repeal of land-use regulations shall not be held more often than once in six (6) months.

History.

42i-9.

262.420.
Civil liability for violation of regulations — Right to enter lands.

The board may provide by ordinance that any landowner or occupier who sustains damages from any violation of land-use regulations by another landowner or occupier may recover damages from the other landowner or occupier for the violation.

The supervisors may go upon lands within the district to determine whether land-use regulations are being observed.

History.

42i-10.

262.430.
Board may file petition to compel observance of land-use regulations.

Where a board finds that any of the provisions of land-use regulations are not being observed on particular lands, and that the nonobservance tends to increase erosion on those lands and is interfering with the prevention or control of erosion on other lands within the district, the board may present to the Circuit Court of the county in which the lands of the defendant lie a verified petition setting forth the adoption of the ordinance prescribing land-use regulations, the failure of the defendant landowner or occupier to observe the regulations and to perform particular work, operations or avoidances as required by the regulations, and that such nonobservance tends to increase erosion on the lands and is interfering with the prevention or control of erosion on other lands within the district. In all cases where the person in possession of lands is not the owner, the owner of the lands shall be joined as party defendant. The petition shall pray the court to require the defendant to perform the work, operations or avoidances within a reasonable time and to order that if the defendant fails to perform the board may go on the land, perform the work or other operations, or otherwise bring the condition of the lands into conformity with the regulations, and recover the costs and expenses thereof, with interest, from the defendant.

Upon the presentation of the petition, the court shall cause process to be issued against the defendant and shall hear the case. If it appears to the court that testimony is necessary for the proper disposition of the matter, it may take evidence or appoint a referee to take such evidence as it may direct, and report the evidence to the court with his findings of fact and conclusions of law, which shall constitute a part of the proceedings upon which the determination of the court shall be made.

History.

42i-11.

262.440.
Court may require performance and may authorize board to do work.

The court may dismiss the petition filed under KRS

262.430

, or it may require the defendant to perform the work, operations or avoidances, and may provide that upon the failure of the defendant to initiate performance within the time specified in the order of the court and to prosecute the work to completion with reasonable diligence, the board may enter upon the lands involved and perform the work or operations or otherwise bring the condition of those lands into conformity with the regulations and recover the costs and expenses thereof, with interest at the rate of five percent (5%) per annum, from the defendant.

History.

42i-11.

262.450.
Board may recover costs and expenses of performing work.

The court shall retain jurisdiction of the case until after the work required by the court under KRS

262.440

has been completed. Upon completion of the work pursuant to the order of the court the board may file a petition with the court, a copy of which shall be served upon the defendant in the case, stating the costs and expenses sustained by the board in the performance of the work and praying judgment for such costs and expenses, with interest. The court shall have jurisdiction to enter judgment for the amount of costs and expenses, with interest at the rate of five percent (5%) per annum until the costs and expenses are paid, together with the cost of the suit.

History.

42i-11.

262.460.
Board of adjustment.

A board that has adopted land-use regulations shall provide by ordinance for the establishment of a board of adjustment consisting of three (3) members, each to be appointed for a term of three (3) years, except that the members first appointed shall be appointed for terms of one (1), two (2) and three (3) years, respectively.

The members of the board of adjustment shall be appointed by the commission, with the advice and approval of the board of the district for which the board of adjustment has been established.

Members of the board of adjustment shall be removable, upon notice and hearing, for neglect of duty or malfeasance in office, but for no other reason. The hearing shall be conducted jointly by the commission and the board of the district.

Vacancies on the board of adjustment shall be filled in the same manner as original appointments, and shall be for the unexpired term.

Members of the commission and the board shall be ineligible to appointment as members of the board of adjustment.

History.

42i-12.

262.470.
Compensation of members of board of adjustment.

The members of the board of adjustment shall receive compensation for their services at the rate of five dollars ($5) per day for time spent on the work of the board of adjustment, in addition to expenses necessarily incurred in the discharge of their duties. The district board shall pay the necessary administrative and other expenses of operation incurred by the board of adjustment upon the certificate of the chairman of the board of adjustment.

History.

42i-12.

262.480.
Meetings of board of adjustment — Chairman — Records.

The board of adjustment shall adopt regulations to govern its procedures. The regulations shall be in accordance with this chapter and with any ordinance adopted pursuant to KRS

262.460

.

The board of adjustment shall select a chairman from among its members, and may, from time to time, change the selection.

Meetings of the board of adjustment shall be held at the call of the chairman and at such other times as the board of adjustment may determine. Any two (2) members of the board of adjustment shall constitute a quorum. The chairman, or in his absence such other member of the board of adjustment as he may designate to serve as acting chairman, may administer oaths and compel the attendance of witnesses. All meetings of the board of adjustment shall be open to the public.

The board of adjustment shall keep a full and accurate record of all proceedings, of all documents filed with it, and of all orders entered, which shall be filed in the office of the board of adjustment and shall be a public record.

History.

42i-12.

262.490.
Landowner may petition for variance from regulations.

Any landowner or occupier may file a petition with the board of adjustment alleging that there are great practical difficulties or unnecessary hardship in the way of his carrying out upon his lands the strict letter of the land-use regulations and praying the board of adjustment to authorize a variance from the terms of the land-use regulations in the application of such regulations to the lands occupied by the petitioner. Copies of the petition shall be served by the petitioner upon the chairman of the board of the district and upon the chairman of the commission.

History.

42i-12.

262.500.
Hearing before board of adjustment.

The board of adjustment shall fix a time for the hearing of the petition and cause due notice of the hearing to be given. The board of the district and the commission may appear and be heard at the hearing. Any owner or occupier of lands lying within the district who objects to the authorizing of the variance prayed for may intervene and become a party to the proceedings. Any party to the hearing before the board of adjustment may appear in person, by agent or by attorney.

History.

42i-12.

262.510.
Board of adjustment may authorize variance.

If, upon the facts presented at the hearing, under KRS

262.500

, the board of adjustment determines that there are great practical difficulties or unnecessary hardship in the way of applying the strict letter of any of the land-use regulations upon the lands of the petitioner, it shall make and record that determination and make and record findings of fact as to the specific conditions which establish those great practical difficulties or unnecessary hardship. Upon the basis of such findings and determination, the board of adjustment may authorize such variance from the terms of the land-use regulations, in their application to the lands of the petitioner, as will relieve the great practical difficulties or unnecessary hardship and will not be contrary to the public interest. The variance shall be such that the spirit of the land-use regulations shall be observed, the public health, safety and welfare secured and substantial justice done.

History.

42i-12.

262.520.
Appeal from board of adjustment.

Any petitioner who has been aggrieved by an order of the board of adjustment granting or denying, in whole or in part, the relief sought, or the board of the district or any intervening party may obtain a review of the order of the board of adjustment in the Circuit Court for the county within which the lands of the petitioner lie, by filing in that court a petition with a copy of the order complained of praying that the order of the board of adjustment be modified or set aside. When such a petition is filed with the clerk of the Circuit Court, he shall issue summons on that petition, directed to be served on the chairman of the board of the district. The practice and proceedings on any and all such petitions shall then be the same as that provided in the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure with the right of the parties to appeal to the Court of Appeals.

History.

42i-12: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 62.

262.525.
Consolidation of districts.

A petition for consolidating two (2) or more districts shall contain a unanimous resolution by each board of supervisors and filed with the commission requesting the mutual consolidation of these districts. The petition shall contain, as a minimum, the proposed name of the consolidated district, a description of the territory of the district, a statement that there is a need for the consolidation and that the consolidation is in the interest of each board of supervisors and the general public, and other information required by the commission. The commission may conduct public meetings and public hearings for the consideration of the petition.

Within sixty (60) days after a petition for consolidation of two (2) or more districts has been received by the commission, it shall give due notice of the consolidation being considered and allow comments to be received for a minimum of thirty (30) days.

The commission shall determine the feasibility of the petition to consolidate the districts, and if the commission determines that the consolidation is feasible, the commission shall certify that determination to each of the district boards involved in the request. In making that determination the commission shall give regard and weight to the attitudes of each board of supervisors, the attitudes of owners and occupiers of lands lying within the district, and other economic and social factors relevant to the determination.

Upon receipt from the commission of a certification that the commission has determined that the consideration is feasible, the boards shall proceed to consolidate the affairs of the districts. The boards shall file a verified application with the Secretary of State for the dissolution of the existing districts and the establishment of a new consolidated district. The application shall state the proposed procedure, the seven (7) supervisors to remain on the newly-formed board appointed by the commission, and set forth a full accounting of all assets and resources consolidated from each district into the newly-formed district. The Secretary of State shall issue to the board a certificate of consolidation and shall record a copy of the certificate in his office.

Application to the Secretary of State shall provide the following information:

The name which is proposed for the new district;

The land to be included in the new district; and

The term of office of each of the supervisors to serve on the newly-formed board of supervisors.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 129, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

262.530.
Landowners may petition for discontinuance of district.

At any time after five (5) years from the organization of a district, twenty-five percent (25%) of the owners of land lying within the boundaries of the district may file a petition with the commission praying that the existence of the district be discontinued. The commission may conduct such public meetings and public hearings upon the petition for discontinuance as may be necessary to assist it in the consideration of it.

History.

42i-15: 1994, ch. 28, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

262.540.
Referendum on discontinuance — Form of question — Effect of informalities.

Within sixty (60) days after a petition for discontinuance of a district has been received by the commission it shall give due notice of the holding of a referendum, supervise the referendum and issue appropriate regulations governing the conduct of the referendum.

The question shall be submitted to the voters in the following form: “For terminating the existence of the . . . . . (name of the district)” and “Against terminating the existence of the . . . . . (name of the district).” The voters shall be instructed to vote “yes” for one or the other of the propositions, as the voter may favor or oppose discontinuance of the district. Only owners of lands lying within the boundaries of the district may vote in the referendum.

No informalities in the conduct of the referendum or in any matters relating to the referendum shall invalidate it or its result if notice of the referendum shall have been given substantially as provided in subsection (1) and the referendum has been fairly conducted.

History.

42i-15: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 360, § 79, effective July 15, 1982.

262.550.
Commission to determine feasibility of continuance of district.

The commission shall publish the result of the referendum and shall determine whether the continued operation of the district within the defined boundaries is administratively practicable and feasible. If the commission determines that the continued operation of the district is administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record the determination and deny the petition. If the commission determines that the continued operation of the district is not administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record that determination and shall certify that determination to the board of the district. In making that determination the commission shall give regard and weight to the attitudes of the owners and occupiers of lands lying within the district, the number of landowners eligible to vote in the referendum who have voted, the proportion of the votes cast in the referendum in favor of the discontinuance of the district to the total number of votes cast, the approximate wealth and income of the landowners and occupiers of the district, the probable expense of carrying on erosion-control operations within the district and such other economic and social factors as are relevant to the determination.

The commission shall not determine that the continued operation of the district is administratively practicable and feasible unless at least a majority of the votes cast in the referendum have been cast in favor of the continuance of the district.

History.

42i-15.

262.560.
Board to terminate affairs of discontinued district — Certification of discontinuance.

Upon receipt from the commission of a certification that the commission has determined that the continued operation of the district is not administratively practicable and feasible, the board shall forthwith proceed to terminate the affairs of the district. The board shall dispose of all property belonging to the district at public auction and shall pay the proceeds of the sale into the State Treasury. The board shall file a verified application with the Secretary of State for the discontinuance of the district, and shall transmit with the application the certificate of the commission setting forth the determination of the commission that the continued operation of the district is not administratively practicable and feasible. The application shall recite that the property of the district has been disposed of and the proceeds paid over as provided in this section, and shall set forth a full accounting of such properties and proceeds of the sale. The Secretary of State shall issue to the board a certificate of dissolution and shall record a copy of the certificate in his office.

History.

42i-15.

262.570.
Effect of discontinuance.

Upon issuance of a certificate of dissolution under KRS

262.560

, all ordinances and regulations theretofore adopted and in force within those districts shall be of no further force and effect. All contracts theretofore entered into, to which the district is a party, shall remain in force and effect for the period provided in those contracts. The commission shall be substituted for the district as a party to such contracts. The commission shall be entitled to all benefits and subject to all duties and liabilities under such contracts which the board would have had. The dissolution shall not affect the lien of any judgment entered under KRS

262.440

or

262.450

, nor the pendency of any action instituted under KRS

262.430

, and the commission shall succeed to all the rights and obligations of the board as to those liens and actions.

History.

42i-15.

262.580.
Discontinuance petition for same district limited to one in five years.

The commission shall not entertain petitions for the discontinuance of any district, conduct referendums upon petitions nor make determinations pursuant to such petitions in accordance with this chapter more often than once in five (5) years.

History.

42i-15.

262.590.
State agencies and subdivisions to cooperate with district.

Agencies of this state which have jurisdiction over or are charged with the administration of, any state-owned lands, and of any governmental subdivision of the state which has jurisdiction over, or is charged with the administration of, any publicly-owned lands, lying within the boundaries of any district, shall cooperate to the fullest extent with the boards of those districts in the effectuation of programs and operations undertaken by the board under this chapter. The boards of such districts may, with consent of such agencies of this state, enter and perform work upon the publicly-owned lands.

History.

42i-14.

262.600.
Districts may cooperate with one another.

The boards of any two (2) or more districts may cooperate with one another in the exercise of any or all powers conferred in this chapter.

History.

42i-13.

262.610.
Acquisitions of equipment or infrastructure by Soil and Water Conservation Commission.

The Soil and Water Conservation Commission as referred to in KRS Chapter 146, subject to the supervision of the commissioner of the Department for Natural Resources, to the restrictions provided in KRS 262.330KRS

262.610

to

262.660

, and to the requirements of KRS Chapters 42 and 45A, is hereby authorized to acquire and to make available, or to assist in acquiring or making available to soil and water conservation districts, heavy or specialized equipment or infrastructure which an individual district cannot itself economically obtain.

When the commission acquires or makes available to any district the equipment or infrastructure above referred to, it shall require said district to fully amortize, in the form of rentals or payments, to the Division of Conservation, as referred to in KRS Chapter 146, any amount so expended by the commission for such assistance. The amount and method of amortization for each piece of heavy equipment or infrastructure shall be determined by the commission, subject to approval of the commissioner of the Department for Natural Resources. The amount and method of amortization for each piece of heavy or specialized equipment shall be determined on the basis of the lease or a rental fee to be charged by the district to the lessee or other user of equipment sufficient to:

Fully amortize to the division the capital outlay for the machinery itself over the period of its reasonably anticipated full usefulness;

Cover the cost of operation, maintenance and repairs;

Pay the usual cost of providing an operator; and

Compensate the district for the usual costs of transportation from one (1) job to another.

In giving effect to all of the foregoing, the commission shall estimate the amount of time such equipment would ordinarily be idle.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 79; 1966, ch. 23, § 63; 1990, ch. 496, § 59, effective July 13, 1990; 2007, ch. 51, § 4, effective June 26, 2007; 2022 ch. 239, § 6, effective April 26, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/26/2022). The language in subsection (1) of this statute has been modified in codification from the way it was enacted in order to reflect the Governor’s line-item veto of 2022 House Bill 604 ( 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 239, sec. 6).

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

262.620.
Title to equipment or infrastructure — Retention — Transfer to district.

The Division of Conservation shall retain title to each piece of heavy or specialized equipment or any infrastructure purchased and made available to any soil and water conservation district until such time as the soil and water conservation districts fully amortize the commission’s investment in the equipment or the infrastructure. If the soil and water conservation district purchases infrastructure with use of funds made available by the Division of Conservation for that purpose, then the Division of Conservation shall be listed on the deed to the property jointly with the district. After the commission’s investment in the equipment or infrastructure has been fully amortized, it is authorized and empowered to transfer the title thereto to the district. If the district has purchased infrastructure with funds made available by the Division of Conservation, the district shall consult with the division prior to the dispossession of the property.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 79; 1966, ch. 23, § 64; 2007, ch. 51, § 2, effective June 26, 2007.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

262.630.
Public records to be kept on equipment and infrastructure — Accounts.

Each soil and water conservation district which receives or uses the equipment referred to in KRS

262.610

shall maintain its public records to show for each piece of equipment:

The hours same has worked on each job in each district;

The amounts collected from each job in each district;

The expense of repairing, moving, manning and other usual costs of operation; and

The amount paid by each district for the purpose of amortizing the commission’s investment in the equipment.

Each soil and water conservation district which leases or otherwise obtains a right of use of the infrastructure with the support of the Division of Conservation pursuant to KRS

262.610

shall maintain in public records a copy of the lease or other contract which provides the district a right of use of the infrastructure; and

In the case of a purchase, the amount paid by each district for the purpose of amortizing the commission’s investment in the infrastructure; or

In the case of lease without right of purchase or some other contractual arrangement or agreement, the payments made to the Division of Conservation for the right of use of the infrastructure.

Each of the soil and water conservation districts shall send a duplicate copy of the records to the commission, who shall retain same in its files for public inspection.

In addition thereto, the commission shall at all times maintain an account showing each piece of equipment, the title to which is vested in it, and any infrastructure, the title of which may be vested solely in the commission or jointly with the district, and the amount paid thereon by any soil and water conservation district, and the amount remaining to be amortized.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 79; 1966, ch. 23, § 65; 2007, ch. 51, § 3, effective June 26, 2007.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/26/2007). Under the authority of KRS 7.136(1), the Reviser of Statutes in codification has changed the internal numbering system in this statute, inserting paragraph designations [(a), (b), (c), and (d)] in place of the subsection numbers [(1), (2), (3), and (4)] within subsection (1) of this section. The words in the text were not changed.

262.640.
Monthly payment on loan or lease — Revolving fund.

The amount paid by any district to the division for amortization of a loan or for payment on a lease shall be made monthly. This amount shall be credited to a revolving fund and the costs of any new equipment or infrastructure shall be charged to the same account. Neither the appropriation herein made nor the revolving fund shall be used for any purpose other than to make available to soil and water conservation districts the equipment or infrastructure of the type referred to in KRS

262.610

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 79; 1966, ch. 23, § 66; 2007, ch. 51, § 5, effective June 26, 2007.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Revolving, trust and agency funds, KRS

45.253

.

262.650.
Districts may combine to acquire equipment or infrastructure.

Any two (2) or more soil and water conservation districts may combine with each other for the purpose of obtaining and using the specialized equipment or infrastructure referred to in KRS

262.610

, upon the terms and conditions set forth in KRS

262.610

to

262.660

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 79; 1966, ch. 23, § 67; 2007, ch. 51, § 6, effective June 26, 2007.